ja: キャンバス対応メディア: アクリル絵の具; 刺繍/手芸; ファブリックペイント; ガッシュ; インク; マーカー; ミクストメディア; 油絵の具; スプレーペイント; 水彩絵の具; その他
en: Canvas compatible media: Acrylic paint; Embroidery/Needlework; Fabric paint; Gouache; Ink; Markers; Mixed media; Oil paint; Spray paint; Watercolor; Other
sv: Målardukens kompatibela media: Akrylfärg; Broderi/handarbete; Textilfärg; Gouache; Bläck; Tuschpennor; Blandteknik (mixed media); Oljefärg; Sprayfärg; Akvarell; Övrigt
sk-SK: Produkty kompatibilné s plátnom: Akrylové farby; Výšivka/ručná práca; Farby na textil; Kvaš; Atrament; Fixky; Kombinované techniky; Olejové farby; Farby v spreji; Akvarel; Iné
es: Materiales compatibles con el lienzo: Pintura acrílica; Bordado/costura; Pintura para tela; Gouache; Tinta; Marcadores; Técnica mixta; Pintura al óleo; Pintura en aerosol; Acuarela; Otro
zh-CN: 适配媒介画布: 丙烯颜料; 刺绣/针线活; 织物颜料; 水粉画; 墨水; 记号笔; 综合材料; 油画颜料; 喷漆; 水彩; 其他
ru: Материалы, подходящие для холста: Акриловые краски; Вышивка / рукоделие; Краски по ткани; Гуашь; Чернила; Маркеры; Смешанная техника; Масляные краски; Аэрозольные краски; Акварель; Другое
th: สื่อศิลปะที่ใช้กับผ้าใบ: สีอะคริลิก; งานปัก/งานฝีมือเย็บปัก; สีเพนต์ผ้า; สีโกวอช; หมึก; ปากกามาร์กเกอร์; สื่อผสม; สีน้ำมัน; สีสเปรย์; สีน้ำ; อื่นๆ
da: Medietyper kompatible med lærredet: Akrylmaling; Broderi/håndarbejde; Tekstilmaling; Gouache; Blæk; Tuscher; Mixed media; Oliemaling; Spraymaling; Akvarel; Andet
ko: 캔버스 호환 매체: 아크릴 물감; 자수/수예; 패브릭 물감; 구아슈; 잉크; 마커; 혼합 미디어; 유화 물감; 스프레이 페인트; 수채화; 기타
hr-HR: Canvas compatible medijski sadržaj: Akrilna boja; Vez/ručni rad; Boja za tkaninu; Gvaš; Tuš; Markeri; Kombinirane tehnike; Uljana boja; Boja u spreju; Vodena boja; Ostalo
nl: Canvas compatibele media: Acrylverf; Borduren/naaiwerk; Textielverf; Gouache; Inkt; Markers; Mixed media; Olieverf; Spuitverf; Aquarel; Overig
bg-BG: Съвместими материали за платно: Акрилна боя; Бродерия/ръкоделие; Боя за тъкани; Гуаш; Мастило; Маркери; Смесена техника; Маслена боя; Спрей боя; Акварел; Други
it: Contenuti multimediali compatibili con Canvas: Colore acrilico; Ricamo/cucito; Colore per tessuti; Gouache; Inchiostro; Pennarelli; Tecnica mista; Colore a olio; Vernice spray; Acquerello; Altro
nb: Canvas-kompatible medier: Akrylmaling; Broderi/håndarbeid; Tekstilmaling; Gouache; Blekk; Tusjer; Blandet teknikk; Oljemaling; Spraymaling; Akvarell; Annet
sl-SI: Mediji, združljivi s platnom: Akrilna barva; Vezenje/ročno delo; Barva za tkanine; Gvaš; Črnilo; Flomastri; Mešane tehnike; Oljna barva; Barva v spreju; Akvarel; Drugo
pt-PT: Meio compatível com a tela: Tinta acrílica; Bordado/costura; Tinta para tecido; Guache; Tinta; Marcadores; Técnica mista; Tinta a óleo; Tinta em spray; Aguarela; Outro
el: Συμβατά μέσα με καμβά: Ακρυλικό χρώμα; Κέντημα/Εργόχειρο; Χρώμα υφάσματος; Γκουάς; Μελάνι; Μαρκαδόροι; Μεικτή τεχνική (mixed media); Λαδομπογιά; Σπρέι; Ακουαρέλα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Medii compatibile cu pânza: Vopsea acrilică; Broderie/cusut; Vopsea pentru textile; Guașe; Cerneală; Markere; Tehnici mixte; Vopsea în ulei; Vopsea spray; Acuarelă; Altele
pl: Kompatybilne media do płótna: Farby akrylowe; Haft/robótki ręczne; Farby do tkanin; Gwasz; Tusz; Markery; Techniki mieszane; Farby olejne; Farby w sprayu; Akwarele; Inne
hu: Vászonnal kompatibilis médiumok: Akrilfesték; Hímzés/Kézimunka; Textilfesték; Gouache; Tinta; Markerek; Vegyes technika; Olajfesték; Festékszóró; Akvarell; Egyéb
cs: Média kompatibilní s plátnem: Akrylová barva; Vyšívání / ruční práce; Barva na textil; Kvaš; Inkoust/tuš; Fixy; Smíšená technika (mixed media); Olejová barva; Barva ve spreji; Akvarel; Jiné
pt-BR: Mídias compatíveis com a tela: Tinta acrílica; Bordado/Trabalho de agulha; Tinta para tecido; Guache; Tinta; Marcadores; Técnica mista; Tinta a óleo; Tinta spray; Aquarela; Outras
fr: Support compatibles avec la toile: Peinture acrylique; Broderie/couture; Peinture pour tissu; Gouache; Encre; Marqueurs; Techniques mixtes; Peinture à l’huile; Peinture en aérosol; Aquarelle; Autre
tr: Tuval uyumlu medya: Akrilik boya; Nakış/iğne işi; Kumaş boyası; Guaj; Mürekkep; Keçeli kalemler; Karışık teknik; Yağlı boya; Sprey boya; Sulu boya; Diğer
fi: Kankaalle sopivat aineet: Akryyliväri; Kirjonta/käsityöt; Kangasväri; Guassi; Muste; Tussit; Sekatekniikka; Öljyväri; Spraymaali; Vesiväri; Muu
de: Mit der Leinwand kompatible Medien: Acrylfarbe; Stickerei/Nadelarbeit; Stofffarbe; Gouache; Tinte; Marker; Mixed Media; Ölfarbe; Sprühfarbe; Aquarellfarbe; Sonstige
zh-TW: 畫布相容媒材: 壓克力顏料; 刺繡/針線活; 紡織顏料; 不透明水彩; 墨水; 麥克筆; 複合媒材; 油畫顏料; 噴漆; 水彩; 其他
vi: Chất liệu canvas tương thích: Sơn acrylic; Đồ thêu/Đồ may vá; Sơn vải; Bột màu gouache; Mực; Bút lông; Chất liệu hỗn hợp; Sơn dầu; Sơn phun; Màu nước; Khác
lt-LT: Su drobe suderinamos medijos: Akriliniai dažai; Siuvinėjimas / rankdarbiai; Audinių dažai; Guašas; Rašalas; Žymekliai; Mišri technika; Aliejiniai dažai; Purškiami dažai; Akvarelė; Kita